src/third_party/mozjs/extract/intl/locales/et/hyphenation/hyph_et.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
.aa4
.aas5ta5
.aa2s1t
.ahe4li
.a1he
.a1l4a
.al4g4as
.al1g
.antii2k5
.a2nt
.an3ti
.a2p3l4
.a1p
.ap3r4
.ar2t5r
.a2rt
.au3a
.eba3
.e1b
.ee4
.ee2la4
.e2k3l4
.e2k5r
.gu4a
.hie5
.i1di4
.i1d
.i5ni1m5a
.i1n
.i2ni1m
.i1ni
.ise5e
.i1se
.i2s4o
.ja4e
.j4a
.ja4t
.ka4e
.ka2o
.ke5hi
.k2e
.ki4p5r4
.ki1p
.ku4p2l4
.ku1p
.ku5sa2
.kusee4
.ku1se
.la4p4l4
.la1p
.le4e
.le5hi
.lemmi1k5
.le1m
.le2m1m
.lem1mi
.le5se
.le2s
.lõ4p2p3
.lõ2p
.ma4a
.maa5a
.ma5j
.mi5s1a2
.mi2s
.mo4e
.nek3
.ni4p
.ni3su5
.noa3
.oa3
.o2o4
.pa4p4p
.pa1p
.pea3a2
.pe2a
.raadio5
.raa1d
.raa3di
.re4a
.re2o
.re2p3r4
.re1p
.re5so
.rü5hi
.rü2h
.sa2k5r
.sa1k
.sa2p3r4
.sa1p
.se4a
.s1k4
.skaa5
.s1ka
.so5li
.so2l
.s1p4
.s1t4
.te2o2o4
.t2e
.te2t3r
.te1t
.ti1na5
.ti1n
.toa3
.t2o
.t1s4
.tsi4s
.t1si
.turba5
.tu2r1b
.tus2
.tu3s1a2
.ul4ga
.ul1g
.ulu4k
.u3lu
.u2m2b
.u1m
.uu4
.vaa3l
.va2s4k3
.ve1re3
.ve1r
.õp1pe5
.õ2p
.õ4p1p
.ää4
.õõ4
.öö4
.ühi4s
.ü2h
.ü1hi
.ü3le3e
.ü2le
.ür2
.ü4ü4
aaa5l
a1aas
4aa1b
aa4bi.
5aa5del.
aa1d
aa1de
aadio5a2
aa3di
a1ae
a4ae1r
aa4fe
aa1f
aa4gan
aa1g
aa2h
aa4has
aa3ha
aa1i
aai4g
aa4is
a5a2it
aa2j
aa2la
aa4lae
aala4r
aa4las
aa4leh
aa1le
aa4lek
aa4lel
aal1g4
aali4k2e
aa3li
aali1k
aa2l3k
a5alli1k
aa2l1l
aal1li
a4a2l3t4
aa2l3õ
aa4lü
aa4ma1d
aa1m
aa1ma
aa4man
aa4mee
aa1me
a5amee1r
aa4mö
4aan
aa4na1m
aa1na
aa4na1t
a5an2d1m
aa4n1d
aan4duu
aan1du
aa5ni
aa2nt4
aa4pek
aa1p
aa1pe
aa4pen
aa4ra4b
a4a1ra
aa4ra1f
aa4ra1j
aara4l
a5ar3te1r
aa2rt
aar1t2e
aa2r3õ
aa4rö
aa4rü
aa4sa1b
aa1sa
aa4sai
aa4sar
aa2se4
aa4so
3aas5ta
aa2s1t
a5a4sul
aa1su
aa4su1t
aa4sü
4aa1t
aa4taa
aa3ta
aa4tas
aa4teh
aa1t2e
5aatom
aa3t2o
aa4tõ
aa4tü2h
aa1tü
a1au
aa3š4i5
a4a1š
a1b
4a3ba
a5be
3a2bi1e2
a4bi1j
5a2bs
a1d
a4da1d
a1da
a4deo
a1de
a2de1r
a3di
adu4r
a1du
adu3se
ad4u2s
a4dö
a5ea3li
ae2d
3aed.
2aee
a3ees
ae4f
1aeg.
ae1g
ae4ga4j
ae4gi
3ae2g1n
2a1e2h
4aei
4aek
a3e4k1s
2ael
a5e2la3ni
ael4an
ae1la
ae2le
ae4lo
a1e4lu.
ae2lu
4ae2m
4aen
ae4pi
ae1p
ae2s
a3e1si
4ae2t1t
ae1t
a1f
a4fek
a1g
3a4ge2nt
ag4ia4
a3go
5ag5re1g
a2g1r
ag1re
agud4
a3gu
1a2hi.
a1hi
ah4kar
a4hk
ah1ka
5ah1nu
ah1n
4ai.
a4i2a
5aian
ai4hu
ai4k2e
ai1k
ai4k1l4
a3i2l1m
ai4lu
ai4me.
ai1m
ai1me
ai2mp4
4ain.
ai1n
a5i2n1f
a5i4ni1me
ai2ni1m
ai1ni
4ai2ns
a3in1s4e
ai4p2r4
ai1p
ai2sa
5aisti1n
ai2s1t
ais3ti
ais2t4r
ai4va
ai1v
a1j
a3ja.
aj4a
a4ja1le
5aja1lo
a4ja1lu
1a2ja1m
4a3jo
aju1t4
a1k
akaa4s
a1ka
a4k4aa1t
ak4as
3a2ken.
a1k2e
a3ki
ak4kis
a4k1k
ak1ki
ak4k2r
a3klas
a2k1l4
ak2la
ak4lau
a5k2lii
ak1li
a3krii
a2k2r
ak1ri
ak3ro
4a4k1s
ak4te4l
a2kt
ak1t2e
a2ku.
a1ku
aku4ma1p
ak4u1m
aku1ma
a5kva3li
a2k1v
3a4la4l1d
a1la
ala4mas
a3la1ma
ala1m
a4laü2h
ala1ü2
a4le4le
a1le
a3l4e1t
ale2t4t
5alga1t
al1g
al4ge1d
a3li
ali4san
ali1sa
a4lis1t2e
ali2s1t
5allee.
a2l1l
al1le
al3lee
al4le4h
al4lu1j
al3lu
al2lü
a4lo1b
a1lo
a2l1s4
4a2lt
4alu.
a1lu
a4lud4
1a2lun
alü4h
a1lü
a4lüt
a1m
4am.
a5ma.
a1ma
a4maa1d
a3maa
3a2me2t1n
a1me
am4e1t
am2it4
a1mi
a1m4o
am4pa4l
a2mp
am1pa
5amper.
am1pe
ampe1r
4a3mü
2an.
3a2na1l4ü
a1na
5anatoom
ana1t
ana3t2o
anat2o4o
an4das
a4n1d
an1da
an4deo
an1de
an4do1g
an1do
2a1ne
a4neh
a3ni
a4ni2so
4a2n1j
an4k3r
a2nk
3an1ku
an4nah
a2n1n
an1na
4a1no
anos4
3an3s4a1m
a2ns
an1sa
4an2s1t
3anten
a2nt
an1t2e
5anti1lo
an3ti
a4o4d
ao4he
a3o4ht
ao4j
ao2le
ao2lu
ao2m
a3o1ma
ao4nu
aoo4p
a2o2o
ao2pe
a5ope1ra
aope1r
ao2r
a5oras
ao1ra
a1o2sa
ao4su
a1o2t1s
a1p
a2par
a1pa
5aparaa
ap4a1ra
a5pa2rt
a3pa2r1v
a3pi
a3p1la
a2p2l4
a3p4o
ap4pal
a4p1p
ap1pa
ap4pi1n
ap1pi
ap4pis
ap3ri
ap2r4
ap3ron
ap1ro
a4p1ru
a3pä
4a1ra
ara4k4k
ara1k
a4ra1se
5are2n1g
a1re
3ar4e3tu
are1t
3arh2it
a2r1h
ar1hi
2a1ri
ari4al
a3r4ia
ari4a2p4
4a2r1k
ar4kel
ar1k2e
5arma4s1t
a2r1m
ar1ma
5armee.
ar1me
ar3mee
a4ro4l
a1ro
1ar2s1t
a2rs
5arti4k1k
a2rt
ar3ti
arti1k
3a2rua4
a1ru
3arva1m
a2r1v
5arvestu2s
ar3ve
arv4e2s1t
arves3tu
1arvu
ar4vää
ar3vä
a4sa4las
a1sa
asa1la
a4sa1me
a3s4a1m
a4sau
ase4ma
a1se
ase1m
as5ema.
1a2sen
a4seos
a4se1se
a4se2t1t
ase1t
3a4s4e3tu
as4fä
a2s1f2
1a2si.
a1si
asi4a2la
a3s4ia
asi3an
a4si4n1d
asi1n
asi1p4
5asjan
a2s1j
asj4a
as1kõ4
a2s1k
as4kõl
a5s2laa1v
a2s1l
as1la
a4sok
a1so
as3o1le
a2so2l
aso4p
as4pe1t
a2s1p
as1pe
as3p2l4
as2p4o
a3spor
as4san
a2s1s
as1sa
as2s5t
4as3ti
a2s1t
5ast1me
as2t1m
ast4ra1k
as2t1r
ast1ra
a4su4b
a1su
a4sud
asui4
a4su2s1s
a5suu
a1t
a3ta
a4taž
5ateljee
a1t2e
ate2l1j
atii4v
a3ti
atmi4k
a2t1m
at1mi
5atr2o2o
a2t1r
at1ro
at4ros
at4rus
at1ru
at4s2o2o
a2t1s
at1so
at2s4p4
at4sü
at2t4s
a2t1t
4a3tu
au2a
aua3l
au4ba.
au1b
4aud
au4de.
au1de
a3ui
4au2j
au4k2e
au1k
au3lu3
aulus4
au4pü4
au1p
a5u2r1g
au2s4o
au2su
a3usul
1au3t2o
au1t
aut2o4o4
auto5s2
au2t4r
a1v
av4a
a4va2ns
a3v4ar
a4veh
a3ve
a1õ2
a1ö2
a1ä2
a1ü2
až4ni
a4žn
4a1š
5baa
baa4g
baa4k
baa4s
ba1b4
bae4
ba1g4
ba4he
ba4ju.
ba1j
ba3k4r
ba1k
b4a4k4s
ba2k4v
ba2p4l4
ba1p
bap4r4
ba4rõ
basa4s
ba1sa
bas4ko
ba2s1k
bas4pe
ba2s1p
ba2t4r
ba1t
4bb
2bd
be3a4
be1b2
be1f4
be1g4
be4lü4
be2ra2
be1r
be2r1k4
be1ro4
be4rõ4
be4si
b4e4s1t
bes4tis
bes3ti
be2t4r
be1t
4bf
4bh
b3ha4
bi4a2la
b4ia
bia4v
2bi1e2
bi4en
4bi1nõ
bi1n
bi4p1la
bi1p
bi2p2l4
bi1s4a
bi4si
bi2s4k
2b1j
2b1k
2b1l
b1l4e
b3le1t4
b2lon
b1lo
2bm
2bn
4bo2rt
2bp
2b1r
3b2ri1g
b1ri
bros4
b1ro
2bs
b3so
2bt4
4bu4k1s
bu1k
bu4lõ
3b4u1m
bu1se5
bu4si4
bus4k2r
bu2s1k
2b3v
1da
daa2
d4a5a1b
daa2la4
da4do
da1d
dae4
da1f4
d5ai1n
da4leh
da1le
da4l4u1m
da1lu
da4lus
5da1m
4da2n1n
da4n4u1m
da1nu
dao4
dara1t4
d4a1ra
4da2r1b
dar4de
da4r1d
4da4re
4da1ru
2da2r1v
d3arv.
4d1a2sen
da1se
da4s4u1m
da1su
2d5b2
2dd
1de
dea2
2deaa2
de5a2v
de1d4
2dee.
dee4le
4de1he
de2k3l4
de4k4s
5del.
de4lau
de1la
4de4lek
de1le
4delu1v
de2lu
de4p2r4
de1p
dep5res1si
dep1re
depre2s1s
de1re4
de1r
de4rel
de4re1p
5de1ro
de1ru4
2df
2d5g
2d1h
1di
dia4v
d4ia
di1d4
di1g4
dii4g
dii1na4
dii1n
dii4sa
dii4su
4di2l1m
4di1ni
di1n
di2os
di4p1lo
di1p
di2p2l4
dis4ai
di1sa
di4sar
di4sas
dis4p2r4
di2s1p
di2t4r
d2it
2d1j
2d3k4
dkop4
d1ko
2d1l
dle4v
d1le
dlu2s1t4
d1lu
2d1m
d3mee4
d1me
dmi4k
d1mi
2d1n
1do
do4h
doi4r
2dos
d3o2sa
5do2s1k
2d3p4
2d1r4
5draa5ma.
d1ra
draa1m
draa1ma
drao4
3dreen
d1re
d4rel
d2ren
3dre1na
2d1s4
dsar4
d1sa
2d3t2
1du
du4b
due4
2d5u4k1s
du1k
d4u2s
du4s1a2
du4see
du1se
du2s1k4
2d1v
2dõ
dõ4l
4dä
2dül
dü4li
4dü4r
5dü4ü
4dž
2d2š
3dše1m
d1še
eaa2
ea3a2j
e1aas
ea2b
e3abi
e1ae
ea2hi
e1ai
ea2j
e4a4k4s
ea1k
ea2k4v
ea2la
e3ala.
e1a4lu
ea2me
ea1m
e5am4e1t
e5a2n1n
ea4nu
eao4
ea2pa
ea1p
e1ar
ea4re
ea2s
e4a2s1s
e5as1t2e
ea2s1t
e5asu1t
ea1su
e3au
ea2v
e3ava.
eav4a
e1b
e1d
e1d4a
e3ea3li
e3ees
ee4fe
ee1f
eei4
ee2k4r
ee2la
3eelar
e5ele2kt
ee1le
ee3l5uu
ee2lu
ee4nai
ee1na
ee4nal
ee4na1m
ee4no
ee2nt4
ee4pai
ee1p
ee1pa
e5e4p2it
ee1pi
5eepos
ee1p4o
ee4ral
ee1r
ee1ra
eer5a1p
ee4ros
ee1ro
ee4rot
ee4si1n
ee1si
e5es2i1ne
ee4s5i2s1t
5eeskir
ee2s1k
ees1ki
ee4sü
ee4tõm
ee1t
ee1tõ
ee4tä
e1f
e1g
e3gaa4
ega2s4t
eg4as
e4goi
4e3ha
e2he.
e1he
e2hi
e3hi1n
5ehi4s1t4
1e4h2it
5ehi3ti
eh4ta4
e4ht
4e1hä
ei4dul
ei1d
ei1du
ei4e2
eie5ri
eie1r
ei2ga
ei1g
e3iga.
ei4ha
ei4he
e3i2l1m
ei2lu
ei4me1m
ei1m
ei1me
5ei5ne.
ei1n
e2i1ne
ei4r2o2o
ei1ro
e5i4sa.
ei1sa
ei4si2s1t
ei1si
ei4tau
e2it
ei1ta
ei4tõ
ei4va.
ei1v
e3j
e3ka
e4ka1hi
e3k2e
ek4ka1p
e4k1k
ek1ka
e2k2l4
ek4lo
e3k4o
ek3re
e2k2r
e3krii
ek1ri
4eks.
e4k1s
5eks4am.
ek1sa
ek3s4a1m
3ekse1m
ek1se
eksi3k
ek1si
3ek4s1ka
ek2s1k
eks2p3r4
ek2s1p
5eks2t3r
ek2s1t
ek4tül
e2kt
ek1tü
e3kü
e2laa4v
e1la
e4la2g1r
ela1g
e2la1m
3ela1mu
el4an
5elani1k
e2la3ni
eleis4
e1le
e4le4k1s
5elekt1ro
e4lek2t1r
ele2kt
3ele1me
ele1m
5elevaa3t2o
ele1v
ele3v4a
elev4aa1t
e3li
e4li1d
eli2i4t
el4kus
e2l1k
el1ku
e4l4o1b
e1lo
elo4p
el2s4t
e2l1s
el2t2r
e2lt
el4tü
e2lu
1elu.
e5lu1b
elu5i4
1e4lun
e3lus.
e4lu2s1s
el5uss.
el4ü3h
e1lü
e1m
5emand.
e1ma
ema4n1d
e5ma1t
em1ne3
e2m1n4
emos4
e1mo
emp4r4
e2mp
5e4mu2l1s
e1mu
end4u2s3
e4n1d
en1du
5e4nelas
e1ne
ene1la
e5ne1m
3e2ne2r1g
ene1r
e4ne1se
en4es
e4ne2s1l
en2k5l4
e2nk
en2k4r
en4sal
e2ns
en1sa
en4tos
e2nt
en3t2o
en4tü
eo5a2
eo4j4a
eo1j
e3o4le
eo2lu
eo2ma
eoo4p
e2o2o
eo5p2l4
e3osa.
eo2sa
e3osa1k
e5osa3li
e5osa1v
e4o2s4f2
e3ots.
eo2t1s
e1p
e3p2l4
e4p3li
ep4lu
e1r
e3raa
e1ra
5erakon
era1k
era1ko
5era4l1d
e4rao
erei2
e1re
erek4
5ergu1t
e2r1g
er3gu
erih4
e1ri
eri4uu
e5riu
er4nau
e2r1n
er1na
e4ro4r
e1ro
e2r1p4
er2p2r4
er2s4k
e2rs
er4taa
e2rt
er1ta
er4ta1k
er4tes
er1t2e
e4rud4
e1ru
es1an
e1sa
1e2se.
e1se
e5sek
e5sen
e5sil
e1si
eska4j
e2s1k
e4s1ka
eska4s
es1k2e4
es5kel
es2k3l4
es2k3r
es2k5ö
es4laa
e2s1l
es1la
es3o1le
e1so
e2so2l
es4or
es2p4o
e2s1p
e3spor
es4si2s1t
e2s1s
es1si
4e2s1t
es4tü
e3su
esu1p4
e1t
e3t4a
e2ten
e1t2e
5etendus.
etend4u2s3
ete4n1d
eten1du
etii4s
e3ti
et2ra
e2t1r
et4si1n
e2t1s
et1si
et4s2o2o
et1so
et4sü
et4ta1j
e2t1t
et1ta
1et1t2e
et4t1ru
et2t1r
et4tä
et4tü
4e3tu
e4tõ4d
e1tõ
e4tüm
e1tü
eu4de
e3u2j
e3u2l
e5u2n
eu4p
eu4s
e5u2s1k
e3uu
e1v
e3v4a
e1õ2
e3ö4
e1ä2
e1ü4
e1š
5faa
f4aa4n
4fa4d
2ff
1fi
fi2i4t
4fj
4fk
2f1l
f2lo
5floo1ra
fl2o2o
2f1n
1fo
fo2l1k5
fo4ro
2f1r
f2re
3frees
2fs
2f1t
fta1t4
f1ta
3fu
3gaa
gaa4r
4gaa2s1t
4ga1b
4gae2d
ga1g4
2gah
ga2hi
gai4g
ga5is
ga3k4
5ga1m
ga3o
ga3p
4ga2rt
4ga2r1v
g4as
4ga4su1k
ga1su
5ga3ta
ga1t
ga2t4r
gau4
ga4va.
ga1v
gav4a
ga4van
2g3b
2gd4
gea4
ge4du.
ge1d
ge1du
gek4
ge5k2l4
4gek1se
ge4k1s
ge4lah
ge1la
gela4s
ge4leh
ge1le
ge3lu
ge4lä
ge4nan
ge1na
geok4
ge4or
4geos
4ge2r1g
ge1r
ge4rus
ge1ru
4gf
4gg
2g1h
gi2a2j
g4ia
gii4s
gi3k
4gi2n1f
gi1n
4gi2nt
gio4r
gi3p2l4
gi1p
gi4san
gi1sa
gi4sil
gi1si
gi4sö
gi2t4r
g2it
gi4va1j
gi1v
2g1j
2g1k
2g1l
g4lüt
g1lü
2g1m
2g1n
gne4t4a
g1ne
gne1t
gne4t2e4
4goh
go4le
go4ma
go4p4o
2g1p4
2g1r
g2ran
g1ra
5gran4aa
gra1na
3g2ra1v
g2ru
3gru1p
4g1s4
2g1t2
g3t1r
3gu
gu1b4
gue4
gu5i
gu4nel
gu1ne
gu3o2
gu1p4
gu4sen
gu1se
gu4sä
guu4j
2g1v
2g3õ4
4gä
gü4l
3ha
ha2a4ri
haa4s
hal4lai
ha2l1l
hal1la
5har
ha1sa4
ha2t4r
ha1t
1he
hee4m
hee4s
hei4s
he2k4v
2hel.
he2l1s4
he2t4r
he1t
4h1h
hhe4l
h1he
1hi
h4ia2
hii4s
5hil
5hi1m
hio2
hi4san
hi1sa
hi4sar
hise4l
hi1se
hi4s1t4
hi4sü
5hi2t1s
h2it
h1j
h3jaa4
hj4a
4hk
h4kal
h1ka
h4kas
h4kis
h1ki
h2k3l4
h4ko4
h2k3r
h4k1s4
h2kt4
h4ku2s1k
h1ku
h3kus
h4ku4su
h4kõ
h4kä
h1l
hle4n
h1le
4h1m
h4mo4
h4mü
h1n
hni1ka5
h1ni
hni1k
1ho
ho1m4o
4hp4
h2rs4
4ht
h2ta
hta2j
h5ta1k
ht2a4l
ht5ar
hta4su
h4te1g
h1t2e
hte4n
h3te4r
h4ti1d
h3ti
h4t2o
h4t1r
h2t5s4
h4tö
h4tä
1hu
hu3a
hue4
hui4d
hu2k4l4
hu1k
hu1p4
hu3sa2
2h1v
hva1d4
hva2s1t4
hve4l
h3ve
h4vi1ni
h3vi
hvi1n
h4vo
hvu4s
1hõ
3hö
1hä
3hü
4ia
iaa2
iaa4l
ia5al2a1ne
iaa2la
i3aa2s1t
i5a4bi
ia1b
ia4bo
i1ae
ia2g
ia2h
i3a2i1ne
iai1n
i1a2j
ia4k2r
ia1k
i3a2kt
i1a2la
i5a2l1b
i3al1li
ia2l1l
i1a2lu
ia2me
ia1m
i5a4met.
iam4e1t
ia2na
i5an2d1j
ia4n1d
i5an2d1m
i2a4ne
i5an1ne
ia2n1n
ia2p4
i3a2par
ia1pa
ia5p2r4
ia2re
i3a2r1m
ia4ru
i1a2r1v
ia2s
ias4k2e
ia2s1k
i5aste.
ia2s1t
ias1t2e
i3a1su
ia4tel
ia1t
ia1t2e
ia2t4r
i1au
iau4l
i5a4va1j
ia1v
iav4a
i5ava4l1d
i1b
i4ba1d
i4bau
i1d
5i2deaa2
i1de
idea2
idii4
i1di
id1lu4
i2d1l
ie2
i3ea3li
i1eel
iei4
i1e4k1s
i5e2la3ni
iel4an
ie1la
i1e2lu
i3eos
ie4ri
ie1r
ie2rs4
i3e1si
ie5so
i5e2s1s
i4e4s1t
i3e2ten
ie1t
ie1t2e
ietu4s
i4e3tu
i1f
i1g
i4ga4g4
i5gar
5igat1su
iga1t
iga2t1s
i4ga1v
ig4ra1m
i2g1r
ig1ra
ih4le
ih1l
ih4t2e
i4ht
ih4ti1n
ih3ti
i4i4a
ii4deo
ii1d
ii1de
ii4du.
ii1du
iie3
ii4es
ii4gaa
ii1g
ii4g4a4s
ii4ha
ii1ka4
ii1k
ii4kis
ii1ki
iik4ro
ii2k2r
iik2s4t
ii4k1s
ii2kt4
ii4la1b
ii1l4a
ii4la1d
ii4lae
ii4la2s1t
iila4s
ii4leh
ii1le
ii4lel
ii4le2s
ii2lõ4
ii4lü
ii4mai
ii1m
ii1ma
iima1t4
ii4m4e1t
ii1me
ii4nai
ii1n
ii1na
ii4nau
i5in1de
ii4n1d
i5i2n1f
ii3ni
i5inimen
ii2ni1m
ii4ni1me
iin2it4
ii2nk4
ii1no4
ii4nol
ii4nos
ii4nõ
ii4p2r4
ii1p
ii4ran
ii1ra
ii4rau
ii2rs4
ii4rü
ii4san
ii1sa
iise4l
ii1se
ii4se1v
ii4sik.
ii1si
iisi1k
ii2ta
i2it
ii4teh
ii1t2e
ii3t2o4
ii4tom
ii4tos
iit5re
ii2t1r
ii4tõ
ii4tü
ii4ves
ii1v
ii3ve
ii4ve1t
ii2vo
i1j
i1k
i4ka1lu
i1ka
i4ka4re
i4k4a2r1k
i4kau1t
i4k5e2lu
i1k2e
ike4si
i3klaa
i2k1l4
ik2la
i3klas
ik4le1r
ik1le
i5k2lu1b
ik1lu
ikop4
i1ko
ikos4
i4ko1v
i3k1re
i2k2r
ik3ro
ik4sar
i4k1s
ik1sa
ik2s4k
iks4p4o
ik2s1p
ik3t2r
i2kt
i3ku
iku3a
i1l4a
ila4s
i4l2a1si
il4ia4
i1li
i4li1si
il4kan
i2l1k
il1ka
il4kõ
ille5s
i2l1l
il1le
il1lo4
5ilme.
i2l1m
il1me
il4mot
il1mo
3ilmu1t
il1mu
ilo5g2
i1lo
il2p3l4
i2l1p
il4ti
i2lt
i5lun
i1lu
ilu3sa2
5ilus3tu
ilu2s1t
ilü4h
i1lü
i1m
i4me2lu
i1me
imi4g
i1mi
imi3su4
imi2s
i4mo4l
i1mo
5impe1r
i2mp
im1pe
i1n
ind3a4l
i4n1d
in1da
5inde4k4s
in1de
inde4r
ind4re
in2d1r4
2i1ne
inee4s
i4neh
i4ne4k1s
ini4kü
